California statutes. Water Code
(1) The entity’s name, address, telephone number, and any other relevant contact information.

(2) The specific authority described in Section 10927 pursuant to which the entity qualifies to assume the groundwater monitoring functions.

(3) A map showing the area for which the entity is
 requesting to perform the groundwater monitoring functions.

(4) A statement that the entity will comply with all of the requirements of this part.

(b) Any entity described in subdivision (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 10927 that seeks to assume groundwater monitoring functions in accordance with this part shall notify the department, in writing, by January 1, 2011. The information provided in the notification shall include all of the following:

(1) The entity’s name, address, telephone number, and any other relevant contact information.

(2) The specific authority described in Section 10927 pursuant to which the entity qualifies to assume the groundwater monitoring functions.

(3) For
 entities that seek to qualify pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 10927, the notification shall also include a copy of the current groundwater management plan or the groundwater component of the integrated regional water management plan, as appropriate.

(4) For entities that seek to qualify pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 10927, the notification shall include a statement of intention to meet the requirements of Section 10935.

(5) A map showing the area for which the entity is proposing to perform the groundwater monitoring functions.

(6) A statement that the entity will comply with all of the requirements of this part.

(7) A statement describing the ability and qualifications of the entity to conduct the groundwater monitoring functions
 required by this part.

(c) The department may request additional information that it deems necessary for the purposes of determining the area that is proposed to be monitored or the qualifications of the entity to perform the groundwater monitoring functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10929.

(a) (1) The department shall review all notifications received pursuant to Section 10928.

(2) Upon the receipt of a notification pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10928, the department shall verify that the notifying entity has the appropriate authority under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 10927.

(3) Upon the receipt of a notification pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10928, the department shall do both of the following:

(A) Verify that each notification is complete.

(B) Assess the qualifications of the notifying party.

(b) If the department has questions about the completeness or accuracy of a notification, or the qualifications of a party, the department shall contact the party to resolve any deficiencies. If the department is unable to resolve the deficiencies, the department shall notify the party in writing that the notification will not be considered further until the deficiencies are corrected.

(c) If the department determines that more than one party seeks to become the monitoring entity for the same portion of a basin or subbasin, the department shall consult with the interested parties to determine which party will perform the monitoring functions. In determining which party will perform the monitoring functions under this part, the department shall follow the order in which entities are identified in Section 10927.

(d) The department shall advise each party on the status of its notification within three months of receiving the notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10930.

Upon completion of each review pursuant to Section 10929, the department shall do both of the following if it determines that a party will perform monitoring functions under this part:

(a) Notify the party in writing that it is a monitoring entity and the specific portion of the basin or subbasin for which it shall assume groundwater monitoring functions.

(b) Post on the department’s Internet Web site information that identifies the monitoring entity and the portion of the basin or subbasin for which the monitoring entity will be responsible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10931.

(a) The department shall work cooperatively with each monitoring entity to determine the manner in which groundwater elevation information should be reported to the department pursuant to this part. In determining what information should be reported to the department, the department shall defer to existing monitoring programs if those programs result in information that demonstrates seasonal and long-term trends in groundwater elevations. The department shall collaborate with the State Department of Public Health to ensure that the information reported to the department will not result in the inappropriate disclosure of the physical address or geographical location of drinking water sources, storage facilities, pumping operational data, or treatment
 facilities.

(b) (1) For the purposes of this part, the department may recommend improvements to an existing monitoring program, including recommendations for additional monitoring wells.

(2) The department may not require additional monitoring wells unless funds are provided for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10932.

(a) Monitoring entities shall commence monitoring and reporting groundwater elevations pursuant to this part on or before January 1, 2012.

(b) For purposes of reporting groundwater elevations pursuant to this part, and subject to subdivision (c), a monitoring entity may use alternate monitoring techniques for a basin or subbasin, instead of monitoring groundwater elevations directly through monitoring wells, if the basin or subbasin meets any of the following conditions:

(1) Groundwater elevations are unaffected by land use activities or planned land use activities, or naturally occurring total dissolved solids within the groundwater preclude the use of that
 water.

(2) It is underlying land that is wholly owned or controlled, individually or collectively, by state, tribal, or federal authorities, and groundwater monitoring information is not available or was requested from, but not provided by, the state, tribal, or federal authorities.

(3) It is underlying an area where geographic or geologic features make monitoring impracticable, including, but not limited to, a basin or subbasin that is inaccessible to well-drilling equipment.

(c) Before using an alternate monitoring technique pursuant to subdivision (b), a monitoring entity shall submit to the department a report, signed by a professional geologist registered pursuant to Section 7850 of the Business and
 Professions Code, setting forth the factual basis and supporting documentation demonstrating that the basin or subbasin meets any of the conditions set forth in subdivision (b). Upon receiving the report, the department shall determine, in its discretion, whether the monitoring entity may use an alternate monitoring technique, and the alternate monitoring techniques that may be used, for the basin or subbasin. For a basin or subbasin that the department has determined is eligible to use an alternate monitoring technique, the department shall determine whether information provided by the monitoring entity using the alternate monitoring technique is sufficient to comply with the monitoring and reporting requirements of subdivision (a).

(d) (1) Within 60 days of finding that a basin or subbasin no longer meets any of the conditions set forth in subdivision (b), the monitoring entity shall report that finding to the
 department. Not later than 12 months after providing that report, the monitoring entity shall commence monitoring and reporting groundwater elevations using monitoring wells.

(2) A failure to comply with the report requirements of paragraph (1) shall constitute noncompliance with the monitoring and reporting requirements of subdivision (a).

(e) Every three years following an initial determination by the department pursuant to subdivision (c), a monitoring entity shall submit sufficient information, as may be determined by the department, establishing its continued eligibility to use alternate monitoring techniques in accordance with this section.

(f) A determination by the department pursuant to this section shall be final and conclusive.

(g) For
 purposes of this section, an “alternate monitoring technique” may include, but is not limited to, one or more of the following, as the department may determine to be appropriate:

(1) Hydrologic records for the basin or subbasin.

(2) Well permits or similar reports from within the area overlying the basin or subbasin.

(3) Aerial photographs.

(4) Remote sensing data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 280, Sec. 2.   (AB 1152)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10933.

(a) The department shall commence to identify the extent of monitoring of groundwater elevations that is being undertaken within each basin and subbasin.

(b) The department shall prioritize groundwater basins and subbasins for the purpose of implementing this section. In prioritizing the basins and subbasins, the department shall, to the extent data are available, consider all of the following:

(1) The population overlying the basin or subbasin.

(2) The rate of current and projected growth of the population overlying the basin or subbasin.

(3) The number of public supply wells that draw from the basin or subbasin.

(4) The total number of wells that draw from the basin or subbasin.

(5) The irrigated acreage overlying the basin or subbasin.

(6) The degree to which persons overlying the basin or subbasin rely on groundwater as their primary source of water.

(7) Any documented impacts on the groundwater within the basin or subbasin, including overdraft, subsidence, saline intrusion, and other water quality degradation.

(8) Any other information determined to be relevant by the department, including adverse impacts on local habitat and local streamflows.

(c) If the department determines that all or part of a basin or subbasin is not being monitored pursuant to this part, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Attempt to contact all well owners within the area not being monitored.

(2) Determine if there is an interest in establishing any of the following:

(A) A groundwater sustainability plan pursuant to Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720).

(B) A groundwater management plan pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750).

(C) An integrated regional water management plan pursuant to Part 2.2 (commencing with Section 10530) that includes a groundwater management component that complies with the requirements
 of Section 10753.7.

(D) A voluntary groundwater monitoring association pursuant to Section 10935.

(d) If the department determines that there is sufficient interest in establishing a plan or association described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), or if the county agrees to perform the groundwater monitoring functions in accordance with this part, the department shall work cooperatively with the interested parties to comply with the requirements of this part within two years.

(e) If the department determines, with regard to a basin or subbasin, that there is insufficient interest in establishing a plan or association described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), and if the county decides not to perform the groundwater monitoring and reporting functions of this part, the department shall do all of the
 following:

(1) Identify any existing monitoring wells that overlie the basin or subbasin that are owned or operated by the department or any other state or federal agency.

(2) Determine whether the monitoring wells identified pursuant to paragraph (1) provide sufficient information to demonstrate seasonal and long-term trends in groundwater elevations.

(3) If the department determines that the monitoring wells identified pursuant to paragraph (1) provide sufficient information to demonstrate seasonal and long-term trends in groundwater elevations, the department shall not perform groundwater monitoring functions pursuant to Section 10933.5.

(4) If the department determines that the monitoring wells identified pursuant to paragraph (1) provide
 insufficient information to demonstrate seasonal and long-term trends in groundwater elevations, the department shall perform groundwater monitoring functions pursuant to Section 10933.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 18.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10933.5.

(a) Consistent with Section 10933, the department shall perform the groundwater monitoring functions for those portions of a basin or subbasin for which no monitoring entity has agreed to perform the groundwater monitoring functions.

(b) Upon determining that it is required to perform groundwater monitoring functions, the department shall notify both of the following entities that it is forming the groundwater monitoring district:

(1) Each well owner within the affected area.

(2) Each county that contains all or a part of the affected area.

(c) The department shall not assess a fee or charge to recover the costs for carrying out its power and duties under this part.

(d) The department may establish regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10933.7.

(a) If the department is required to perform groundwater monitoring functions pursuant to Section 10933.5, the county and the entities described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 10927 shall not be eligible for a water grant or loan awarded or administered by the state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall determine that an entity described in subdivision (a) is eligible for a water grant or loan under the circumstances described in subdivision (a) if the entity has submitted to the department for approval documentation demonstrating that its entire service area qualifies as a disadvantaged community.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10934.

(a) For purposes of this part, neither any entity described in Section 10927, nor the department, shall have the authority to do either of the following:

(1) To enter private property without the consent of the property owner.

(2) To require a private property owner to submit groundwater monitoring information to the entity.

(b) This section does not apply to a county or an entity described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 10927 that assumed responsibility for monitoring and reporting groundwater elevations prior to the effective date of this
 part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10935.

(a) A voluntary cooperative groundwater monitoring association may be formed for the purposes of monitoring groundwater elevations in accordance with this part. The association may be established by contract, a joint powers agreement, a memorandum of agreement, or other form of agreement deemed acceptable by the department.

(b) Upon notification to the department by one or more entities that seek to form a voluntary cooperative groundwater monitoring association, the department shall work cooperatively with the interested parties to facilitate the formation of the association.

(c) The contract or agreement shall include all of the
 following:

(1) The names of the participants.

(2) The boundaries of the area covered by the agreement.

(3) The name or names of the parties responsible for meeting the requirements of this part.

(4) The method of recovering the costs associated with meeting the requirements of this part.

(5) Other provisions that may be required by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10936.

Costs incurred by the department pursuant to this chapter may be funded from unallocated bond revenues pursuant to paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 75027 of the Public Resources Code, to the extent those funds are available for those purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.12. Recycled Water Usage by Car Washes [10950. - 10953.]

10950.

The following definitions govern the construction of this part:

(a) “Conveyor car wash” means a commercial car wash where the vehicle moves on a conveyor belt during the wash and the driver of the vehicle can remain in, or wait outside of, the vehicle.

(b) “In-bay car wash” means a commercial car wash where the driver pulls into a bay, parks the car, and the vehicle remains stationary while either a machine moves over the vehicle to clean it or one or more employees of the car wash clean the vehicle, instead of the vehicle moving through a tunnel.

(c) “Self-service car wash” means a commercial
 car wash where a customer washes his or her own car with spray wands and brushes.

(d) “Water recycling system” means a water system at the car wash that captures and reuses water previously used in wash or rinse cycles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 545, Sec. 2.   (AB 2230)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10951.

An in-bay car wash or a conveyor car wash permitted and constructed after January 1, 2014, shall do either of the following:

(a) Install, use, and maintain a water recycling system that recycles and reuses at least 60 percent of the wash and rinse water.

(b) Use recycled water provided by a water supplier for at least 60 percent of its wash and rinse water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 545, Sec. 2.   (AB 2230)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10952.

This part shall not apply to a self-service car wash.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 545, Sec. 2.   (AB 2230)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10953.

This part shall not be construed to limit the power of any city, city and county, or county to require more stringent levels of recycled water use at a car wash.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 545, Sec. 2.   (AB 2230)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. CENTRAL VALLEY PROJECT [11100. - 11985.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [11100. - 11160.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [11100. - 11107.]

11100.

The definitions in this article govern the construction of this part only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.

“State agency” includes any irrigation district, reclamation district, municipal utility district, public utility district, water district, water storage district, and any public or municipal corporation, political subdivision, district, State agency or authority now or hereafter organized under and by virtue of the laws of the State now in effect or hereafter enacted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 376.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.

“Electric power” includes “electricity,” “electric energy” and “electrical energy.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.

“Project” means the Central Valley Project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.

“Construction fund” means the Central Valley Water Project Construction Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.

“Revenue fund” means the Central Valley Water Project Revenue Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11107.

Unless the context otherwise requires, “bond” means any bond or other written evidence of indebtedness which the department may issue under this part in order to secure funds with which to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Statement of Policy [11125. - 11128.]

11125.

The public interest, welfare, convenience, and necessity require the construction in the manner provided in this part of a system of works for the conservation, development, storage, distribution, and utilization of water, with incidental generation, transmission, and distribution of electric power which system of works is designated as the Central Valley Project and is specifically approved and authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11126.

The construction, operation, and maintenance of the project as provided for in this part is in all respects for the welfare and benefit of the people of the State, for the improvement of their prosperity and their living conditions, and the provisions of this part shall therefore be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes and objects thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11127.

The department shall be regarded as performing a governmental function in carrying out the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11128.

The limitations prescribed in Section 11460 and 11463 shall also apply to any agency of the State or Federal Government which shall undertake the construction or operation of the project, or any unit thereof, including, besides those specifically described, additional units which are consistent with and which may be constructed, maintained, and operated as a part of the project and in furtherance of the single object contemplated by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1325.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Use of State Property [11130. - 11131.]

11130.

The State hereby consents to the use and occupation of any real property now or hereafter owned by it, and not dedicated to public use, necessary for the construction, operation, or maintenance of the project, including land of the State lying beneath any navigable waters of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11131.

Whenever any land or rights of way of the State heretofore or hereafter dedicated to public use are necessary for the construction, operation, or maintenance of the project, the land or rights of way may be used therefor, but only in accordance with the terms and conditions of an agreement to be first entered into between the Department of Water Resources and the state department or other agency of the State having jurisdiction over or control and management of the land or rights of way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Aid From State Agencies or Other Sources [11135. - 11141.]

11135.

Any State agency may advance or contribute money, rights of way, labor, materials, and any other property for the construction, operation, or maintenance of the project or any unit thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11136.

Appropriations for advances or contributions under this article may be made from any funds available for the purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11137.

Any State agency may issue its general obligation bonds for the purpose of making advances or contributions under this article and all proceedings for the authorization, issue, and sale of such bonds shall be had under the law governing the issue and sale of bonds for public improvements by the particular State agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11138.

Money or property advanced or contributed may be immediately transferred or delivered to the department to be used for the purpose for which the advance or contribution was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11139.

The department may enter into an agreement with any state agency to repay any money or the value of any rights of way, labor, materials, or other property advanced or contributed; but no repayment therefor shall be made until all obligations issued by the department for the construction of the project have been fully redeemed and paid, and then only out of the revenues received from the operation of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11140.

After all bonds issued have been fully redeemed and paid, the department may continue to collect revenues from the use and operation of the project for the purpose of reimbursing any state agency for any expenditures made by it and for the purpose of repayment of any amount the department shall have agreed to repay for money, rights of way, labor, materials, or other property advanced or contributed for the construction of the project or unit thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11141.

The department may receive and accept from any and all sources money, rights of way, labor, materials, or any other property for the construction, operation, or maintenance of the project or any unit or specific portion of any unit thereof or for any of the purposes of this part, and may agree with the person or entity so contributing to apply the money or property in the manner and for the purpose for which contributed, and the contribution shall thereupon be used and applied in accordance with the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Record of Proceedings and Report to Governor [11155. - 11155.]

11155.

The State Controller, the State Treasurer, and the department shall keep full and particular account and record of all their proceedings under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Cooperation by State Officials [11160. - 11160.]

11160.

The department, the officials thereof, and all state officials may do such acts and make such agreements not inconsistent with law as may be necessary or desirable in connection with the duties and powers conferred upon them respectively by law regarding the construction, maintenance, and operation of the project and the safeguarding of the funds and revenues required for such construction and the payment of the indebtedness incurred therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Description of the Project [11200. - 11295.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11200. - 11201.]

11200.

Subject to Articles 9.5 (commencing at Section 11260), 9.7 (commencing at Section 11270), and 9.9 (commencing at Section 11276) hereof, the construction of the project is a single object and the units thereof collectively constitute one project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1774.)
-------------------------------------------

11201.

The project as authorized by this part consists of the units provided for in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Shasta Dam [11205. - 11209.]

11205.

The unit designated as Shasta Dam consists of the following:

(a) A dam, reservoir, and one or more hydroelectric power plants, with necessary afterbay and regulatory appurtenant works located on the Sacramento River at or near Kennett.

(b) A transmission line having capacity sufficient to transmit all the electric power which can be generated at the dam, including substations, transformer stations, and other facilities for the distribution of power from the dam to a central substation near Antioch.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11206.

The transmission line shall be located in such manner and along such route as to enable the most convenient distribution of electric power to the load centers traversed thereby or capable of service therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11207.

Shasta Dam shall be constructed and used primarily for the following purposes:

(a) Improvement of navigation on the Sacramento River to Red Bluff.

(b) Increasing flood protection in the Sacramento Valley.

(c) Salinity control in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(d) Storage and stabilization of the water supply of the Sacramento River for irrigation and domestic use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11208.

Shasta Dam shall be constructed and used secondarily for the generation of electric power and other beneficial uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11209.

The dam shall be built to such height and the power plant or plants shall be of such capacity as the department determines. The reservoir shall have such storage capacity as the department determines but the capacity shall be not less than 2,940,000 acre-feet of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contra Costa Conduit [11215. - 11216.]

11215.

The unit designated as the Contra Costa Conduit consists of a conduit or canal equipped with all necessary pumping plants and other works to convey water and extending westerly from a diversion point near Knightsen southerly of Suisun Bay to the vicinity of Martinez.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11216.

The Contra Costa Conduit shall be of such capacity as the department determines to be necessary to furnish an adequate supply of water for industrial, agricultural, domestic, and other beneficial uses in the area served by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. San Joaquin Pumping System [11220. - 11220.]

11220.

The unit designated as the San Joaquin Pumping System consists of a channel or canal with all necessary dams, pumping plants, conduits, and other works which the department determines to be necessary to convey a supply of water for irrigation and other beneficial uses from the lower Sacramento River into the San Joaquin Delta, and also adequate to convey and transport not less than 3,000 cubic feet of water per second from a point on the lower San Joaquin River southerly to the mouth of Fresno Slough.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Friant Dam [11225. - 11227.]

11225.

The unit designated as Friant Dam consists of a dam, reservoir, and one or more hydroelectric power plants to be located on the San Joaquin River at or near Friant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11226.

Friant Dam shall be constructed and used primarily for improvement of navigation, flood control, and storage and stabilization of the water supply of the San Joaquin River, for irrigation and domestic use, and secondarily for the generation of electric power and other beneficial uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11227.

The dam shall be built to such height and the power plant or plants shall be of such capacity as the department determines. The reservoir shall have such capacity as the department determines but the capacity shall be not less than 400,000 acre-feet of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Madera Canal [11230. - 11231.]

11230.

The unit designated as the Madera Canal consists of a canal or conduit leading from the reservoir of Friant Dam northerly to a point on the Chowchilla River.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11231.

The Madera Canal shall be of such capacity as the department determines to be necessary to furnish an adequate supply of water for beneficial purposes in the area to be served by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Friant-Kern Canal [11235. - 11237.]

11235.

The unit designated as the Friant-Kern Canal consists of a canal or conduit extending from the reservoir of Friant Dam southerly to a point on Kern River near Bakersfield.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11236.

The Friant-Kern Canal shall be of such capacity as the department determines to be necessary to furnish an adequate supply of water for beneficial purposes in the area to be served by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11237.

The unit may include such pumps, supplemental dams, and other works as the department determines to be necessary for the economical and advantageous construction, operation, and maintenance of the unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Tehama-Colusa Conduit [11240. - 11242.]

11240.

The unit designated as the Tehama-Colusa Canal consists of a conduit or canal, equipped with the necessary dams, pumping plants, groundwater recharge facilities, and other related works extending from the Sacramento River, at or near Red Bluff, southerly through the Counties of Tehama, Glenn, Colusa, Yolo, Solano, and Napa, and serving those counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 415, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11241.

The Tehama-Colusa Canal shall have the capacity that the department, in cooperation with local public agencies in the service area, determines to be necessary to provide an adequate supply of water for industrial, agricultural, domestic, waterfowl refuge, wildlife, fisheries, and other beneficial uses in the area the canal serves.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 415, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11242.

The water facilities authorized by Sections 11240 and 11241 may be constructed, owned, and operated by one or more local agencies, the department, or a joint powers authority created by agreement between those entities. Any joint powers authority may additionally include the federal Bureau of Reclamation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 415, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Tehama-Butte Conduit [11250. - 11251.]

11250.

The unit designated as the Tehama-Butte Conduit consists of a conduit or canal, equipped with all necessary dams, pumping plants, and other appurtenant works, extending from the Sacramento River at or near Red Bluff southerly through Tehama, Butte, and Sutter counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11251.

The Tehama-Butte Conduit shall be of such capacity as the department determines to be necessary to furnish an adequate supply of water for industrial, agricultural, domestic, and other beneficial uses in the area to be served by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.1. Hogan Dam [11252. - 11254.]

11252.

The unit designated as Hogan Dam and Reservoir, substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document No. 545, 78th Congress, Second Session, and authorized by act of Congress approved December 22, 1944, Public Law 534, 78th Congress, Second Session, subject to such further modifications thereof as the department may adopt, and such unit may be constructed, maintained, and operated separate and apart from any or all other units thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1750.)
-------------------------------------------

11253.

Pending construction of the unit described in Section 11252, herein designated “New Hogan,” the department may acquire and operate as a unit of the project, separate and apart from any or all other units thereof, the existing Hogan Dam and Reservoir and appurtenant works, herein designated “Old Hogan,” located on the Calaveras River and owned by the City of Stockton, and may integrate the operation thereof with “New Hogan” when it is constructed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1750.)
-------------------------------------------

11254.

Contracts entered into between the department and the City of Stockton in connection with the transfer of “Old Hogan” to the State, including provisions for the delivery of water from the dam and reservoir, shall not be subject to the limitations contained in Section 11139.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1750.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.2. Los Banos Grandes Reservoir [11255. - 11257.]

11255.

Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 12931, the Legislature hereby authorizes, as a part of the State Water Resources Development System, the Los Banos Grandes Reservoir to be located south of the delta and adjacent to the San Luis Reservoir for the purposes of developing additional water supply, providing improved water quality, and providing operational flexibility for fish and wildlife preservation and enhancement in accordance with the Davis-Dolwig Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 11900)). The Los Banos Grandes Reservoir may be constructed in one or more stages, as determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1656, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11256.

In conducting the feasibility investigations for the Los Banos Grandes Reservoir, the department shall consider the impact of the project on drainage and groundwater lands in the adjacent farm areas, including making a study of the occurrence and distribution of selenium in the drain waters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1656, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11257.

The department may use Central Valley Project revenue bonds to finance, all or in part, the construction of the Los Banos Grandes Reservoir.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1656, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.3. Groundwater Storage [11258. - 11258.]

11258.

The project shall include facilities south of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta for utilizing groundwater storage space, determined by the director to be feasible for the purpose of providing yield for the State Water Resources Development System.
